Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1670.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 635 of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, is amended to read:Section 635. Hearing Aid Coverage.--(a) Any insurer that underwrites Medicare or Medicaid insurance for insureds residing in this Commonwealth shall provide coverage in such insurance for a hearing aid sold in accordance with section 403 of the act 123456789101112131415161718192021 of November 24, 1976 (P.L.1182, No.262), known as the "Hearing Aid Sales Registration Law."(b) A health insurance policy or government program shall provide coverage for a hearing aid sold in accordance with section 403 of the "Hearing Aid Sales Registration Law," subject to any applicable copay, coinsurance or deductible.(c) The health insurance policy shall make available, starting with the first year of enrollment and every three years thereafter, no less than a two thousand five hundred dollar benefit toward coverage for a hearing aid. The benefit may be used by the insured with either:(1) an entity in the business of selling hearing aids; or(2) a fitter that is contracted with the health insurance policy.(d) As used in this section:(1) "Business of selling hearing aids" means as defined in section 103 of the "Hearing Aid Sales Registration Law."(2) "Fitter" means as defined in section 103 of the "Hearing Aid Sales Registration Law."(3) "Government program" includes the following:(i) The Commonwealth's medical assistance program established under Subarticle (f) of Article IV of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the "Human Services Code."(ii) The Children's Health Insurance Program established under Article XXIII-A of this act.(4) "Health insurance policy" means a policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan issued by an insurer that provides medical or health care coverage. The term does not include any of the following policies:20250HB1670PN2038 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Accident only.(ii) Credit only.(iii) Long-term care or disability income.(iv) Specified disease.(v) Medicare supplement.(vi) TRICARE, including a Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services supplement.(vii) Fixed indemnity.(viii) Dental only.(ix) Vision only.(x) Workers' compensation.(xi) Automobile medical payment insurance.(xii) Hospital indemnity.(xiii) Limited benefit.(5) "Insurer" means an entity licensed by the Insurance Department that offers, issues or renews an individual or group health insurance policy that is offered or governed under any of the following:(i) This act, including section 630 and Article XXIV.(ii) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the "Health Maintenance Organization Act."(iii) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations).Section 2. This act shall apply as follows:(1) For health insurance policies for which either rates or forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, this act shall apply to any policy for which a form or rate is first filed on or after the effective date of this section.20250HB1670PN2038 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) For health insurance policies for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, this act shall apply to any policy issued or renewed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250HB1670PN2038 - 4 - 123456